Massachusetts, session 194th, H3555.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23J of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
SECTION 13. The department shall annually, not later than August 15, submit to the
governor, the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy, the joint committee
on environment and the senate and house committees on ways and means a report detailing all
expenditures over the previous fiscal year from alternative compliance payments received by the
department and from the redemption or sale by the department of certificates or credits
authorized and created by present or future programs developed under chapter 21N of the
General Laws, including but not limited to 310 CMR 7.75 and 310 CMR 7.77. Said report shall
include a description of (i) the cost impacts of these expenditures on ratepayers of electric
distribution companies or gas companies, as those terms are defined in section 1 of chapter 164
of the General Laws, and other entities which are under the jurisdiction of the department and
of 2

participating in said programs; provided further, impacts shall include approximate monthly bill
impacts delineated by customer class or group; and (ii) how said expenditures contribute to
achieving compliance with limits and sublimits established pursuant to sections 3 and 3A of
chapter 21N of the General Laws.
of 2